Louisiana, session 2026, SB350.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:3552(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3552. Louisiana Soybean and Grain Research and Promotion Board; creation and
organization
A. The Louisiana Soybean and Grain Research and Promotion Board is
created with its domicile at Baton Rouge, Louisiana. The board shall be composed
of twelve producer members to be appointed by the governor to serve terms
concurrent with the governor. Each appointment by the governor shall be submitted
to the Senate for confirmation. Eight members of the board shall be practical
producers of soybeans in the state of Louisiana and four members shall be practical
producers of wheat, corn, or grain sorghum. The Louisiana Farm Bureau Federation,
Inc., shall submit the names of eight practical soybean producers to the governor, and
he shall appoint five persons from the nominees to serve on the board. The Louisiana
Soybean Cotton and Grain Association shall submit the names of five practical
soybean producers to the governor, and he shall appoint three members from the
nominees to serve on the board. The Louisiana Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., shall
submit the names of three persons who produce wheat, corn, or grain sorghum to the
governor and he shall appoint two persons from these nominees to serve on the
board. The Louisiana Cotton and Grain Association shall submit the names of three
persons who produce wheat, corn, or grain sorghum to the governor and he shall
appoint two persons from these nominees to serve on the board. Every fourth year
the aforenamed organizations shall submit the names of nominees to the governor
and succeeding boards shall be appointed by the governor in the same manner,
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 350 ENROLLED
giving equal representation to each organization in the appointment of the eight
members who are practical soybean producers.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.